Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202179-9,115.01
Class V School Expense Fund; created; use.

The Class V School Expense Fund is created. Beginning September 1, 2024, the fund shall be credited with money from the retirement system assets and income sufficient to pay the pro rata share of administrative expenses incurred as directed by the retirement board for the proper administration of the Class V School Employees Retirement Act and as necessary in connection with the administration and operation of the retirement system.

Laws 2021, LB147, § 37.
May 27, 2021